Maryland, session 2025, HB1430.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
6–1009.
(a) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, beginning on July 1, [2022]
2025, teacher [salary increases] COMPENSATION associated with the career ladder shall
at a minimum include the following STIPEND AMOUNTS, PAID IN THE YEAR THAT THE
TEACHER ACHIEVES THE ADVANCEMENT ON THE CAREER LADDER AND IN THE
FOLLOWING 3 YEARS:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1430*

HOUSE BILL 1430
(i) Becoming an NBC teacher – [$10,000 salary increase] $5,000
ANNUAL STIPEND;
(ii) An NBC teacher teaching at a low–performing school as
identified by the county board – [$7,000 salary increase] $3,500 ANNUAL STIPEND;
(iii) Becoming lead teacher – [$5,000 salary increase] $2,500
ANNUAL STIPEND;
(iv) Becoming distinguished teacher – [$10,000 salary increase]
$5,000 ANNUAL STIPEND;
(v) Becoming professor distinguished teacher – [$15,000 salary
increase] $7,500 ANNUAL STIPEND; [and]
(vi) Becoming a distinguished principal – [$15,000 salary increase]
$7,500 ANNUAL STIPEND; AND
(VII) ACHIEVING ANY OTHER CERTIFICATION THAT A COUNTY
BOARD DETERMINES IS EFFECTIVE IN ADVANCING ONE OF THE ITEMS NECESSARY
FOR IMPLEMENTING THE BLUEPRINT ENUMERATED UNDER § 1–303 OF THIS
ARTICLE – $3,500 ANNUAL STIPEND.
(2) The teacher [salary increases] COMPENSATION STIPENDS under
paragraph (1) of this subsection do not apply to paragraph (1)(iii) through [(vi)] (VII) of this
subsection until § 6–1002(a) of this subtitle becomes effective as recommended by the
Department and approved by the Accountability and Implementation Board.
(b) (1) [Salary increases] COMPENSATION STIPENDS associated with
maintenance of an NBC are subject to collective bargaining in accordance with § 6–408 of
this title.
(2) The State share for the following [salary increases] COMPENSATION
STIPENDS provided under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall not exceed the following
amounts, PAID IN THE YEAR THAT THE TEACHER EARNS THE MAINTENANCE OF NBC
AND THE FOLLOWING 3 YEARS:
(i) Earning a first maintenance of NBC – [$8,000 salary increase]
$4,000 ANNUAL STIPEND;
(ii) Earning a second maintenance of NBC – [$7,000 salary increase]
$3,500 ANNUAL STIPEND; and

HOUSE BILL 1430 3
(iii) Earning a third maintenance of NBC – [$6,000 salary increase]
$3,000 ANNUAL STIPEND.
(c) (1) If a teacher is eligible for more than one [salary increase] ANNUAL
STIPEND under subsections (a) and (b) of this section, the teacher shall receive all [salary
increases] ANNUAL STIPENDS that apply.
(2) A teacher that receives [a salary increase] AN ANNUAL STIPEND under
subsection (a)(2) of this section for teaching at a low–performing school may not lose that
[salary increase] ANNUAL STIPEND while teaching at the school even if the school ceases
to be low–performing.
(d) On or before July 1, 2024, each county shall demonstrate to the Accountability
and Implementation Board established under § 5–402 of this article that, during the period
between July 1, 2019, and June 30, 2024, teachers in the county received a 10% salary
increase above the negotiated schedule of salary increases between the public school
employer and exclusive representative for the employee organization.
(e) Beginning on July 1, 2026, the minimum teacher salary for all teachers shall
be $60,000.
(f) (1) In this subsection, “total program amount” means the sum of, for each
item under subsections (a) and (b)(2) of this section:
(i) The teacher [salary increase] ANNUAL STIPEND multiplied by
the number of teachers receiving the [salary increase] ANNUAL STIPEND; and
(ii) Rounded to the nearest whole dollar.
(2) The [increase in the salary] ANNUAL STIPEND required under
subsections (a) and (b)(2) of this section shall be a shared cost between the State and the
county in accordance with this subsection.
(3) The required State share for each county is the result of the following
calculation multiplied by 0.5 and rounded to the nearest whole dollar:
(i) The [salary increase] ANNUAL STIPEND multiplied by the
number of teachers eligible to receive the [salary increase] ANNUAL STIPEND in the prior
fiscal year;
(ii) Divide the result calculated under item (i) of this paragraph by
the ratio, rounded to seven decimal places, of local wealth per pupil to statewide wealth per
pupil as defined in § 5–201 of this article; and
(iii) Multiply the result calculated under item (ii) of this paragraph
by the result, rounded to seven decimal places, that results from dividing the total program

HOUSE BILL 1430
amount by the sum of all of the results calculated under item (ii) of this paragraph for all
counties.
(4) The required local share is equal to the total program amount for each
county minus the State share calculated under paragraph (3) of this subsection and
rounded to the nearest whole dollar.
(g) (1) Beginning in fiscal year 2023, the State shall distribute the State share
of the teacher [salary increases] ANNUAL STIPENDS as calculated under subsection (f) of
this section to each county board.
(2) Beginning in fiscal year 2023, the county shall distribute the local share
of the teacher [salary increases] ANNUAL STIPENDS as calculated under subsection (f) of
this section to each county board.
(3) Beginning in fiscal year 2023, the county board shall distribute the
State and the local share of the teacher [salary increase] ANNUAL STIPENDS to the school
in which the teacher works.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) On or before June 1, 2030, the State Department of Education shall conduct a
study on the efficacy of teachers who have received National Board Certification issued by
the National Board for Professional Teaching Standards.
(b) The study required under subsection (a) of this section shall:
(1) evaluate the efficacy of National Board Certified teachers by examining
the performance of students taught by National Board Certified teachers on the
assessments administered under the Maryland Comprehensive Assessment Program in
comparison with the performance of similar students taught by teachers of similar
experience who are not National Board Certified;
(2) conduct a statistical analysis comparing the assessment results of
students taught by National Board Certified teachers with teachers who are not National
Board Certified for school years 2025–2026 through 2028–2029, controlling for teacher
experience levels and the prior test scores of the students; and
(3) determine whether the students taught by National Board Certified
teachers achieved higher assessment results compared to other students taught by teachers
who are not National Board Certified on any measure assessed, using a confidence interval
of 95%.
(c) On or before September 1, 2030, the Department shall report to the Governor
and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly
on the results of the study required under subsection (a) of this section.

HOUSE BILL 1430 5
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 1 of this Act shall be
construed to apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any
effect on or application to any public school employee contracts, including teacher salary
increases, agreed to before the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.